District of Columbia statutes.
47-2863

Self-certification and enforcement (conditional).

(a)

(1)

This subchapter shall be enforced by self-certification by the applicant for a license or permit, provided that the veracity of the self-certification may be investigated upon the initiative of the District government at any time.

(2)

At the time of application for a license or permit the applicant shall certify on a form provided by the District government that the applicant owes no outstanding debt over $100 to the District government as a result of any fine, fee, penalty, interest, or past due tax as set forth in § 47-2862.

(3)

Upon receipt of the applicant’s certification that the issuance of the license or permit is not prohibited by this subchapter, the District government shall consider the application as otherwise provided by law, unless the government has information indicating that the applicant has not paid an outstanding debt under § 47-2862.

(b)

Upon the implementation of the interagency computer system required by § 47-2866(a)(1), this section shall expire.

May 11, 1996, D.C. Law 11-118, § 4, 43 DCR 1191
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 1011(d), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 209(c), 54 DCR 903
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 164(a)(2), 56 DCR 1117
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1011(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1011(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1011(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a)(3).
“(c) Upon receipt of the applicant’s certification that the issuance of the license or permit is not prohibited by this subchapter, the District government shall proceed to consider the application as otherwise provided by law.”
D.C. Law 16-279 rewrote subsec. (a)(3) redesignated from subsec. (c) by Law 16-192, which formerly read:
D.C. Law 16-192 redesignated former subsecs. (a), (b), and (c) as pars. (1), (2), and (3) of subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).
1981 Ed., § 47-2863.
This section is referenced in § 25-402, § 25-405, § 47-2866, and § 50-1501.02.